Missouri, session 2026, HB3197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 454, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 454.486, to read as follows:
454.486. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Absent parent", a parent not residing with or not providing direct care for a
child at birth;
(2) "Genetic test", a DNA-based paternity test administered by a hospital or
licensed medical provider and processed by an accredited laboratory;
(3) "Mother", a woman who gives birth to a child;
(4) "Putative father", any man alleged or presumed to be the father of a child,
including a man married to the mother unless disproven by a genetic test.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law, beginning January 1, 2027, a genetic
test shall be administered at the time of birth for every newborn child in this state when:
(1) A putative father is identified;
(2) Paternity is disputed; or
(3) The mother or alleged father requests testing.
3. (1) Paternity shall be considered legally established only upon receipt of a
valid genetic test confirming a biological relationship of at least ninety-nine percent
probability.
(2) If a genetic test excludes a putative father:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3197 2
(a) The excluded putative father shall bear no legal or financial responsibility for
the child, including child support; and
(b) The excluded putative father shall not be subject to back child support or
arrears.
(3) No civil or criminal penalties shall be imposed for failure to support a child
before the genetic test results.
4. (1) An absent parent shall not accrue child support obligations, including
retroactive payments, until paternity is genetically established.
(2) No person shall be prosecuted, jailed, or penalized for failure to pay child
support for a child prior to a genetic test confirming paternity.
(3) Any child support order issued in error due to misassigned paternity shall be
void, and the affected individual shall be released from all arrears.
5. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri Genetic
Testing Fund", which may consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly
or any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other
sources. Moneys in the fund shall be used to cover all or part of the costs of genetic
testing for persons who are not able to pay for such testing. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this subdivision.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
6. (1) Genetic test results shall be used exclusively for establishing paternity and
child support purposes and shall not be used for criminal investigations without a court
order.
(2) All genetic materials and data shall be destroyed after a paternity
determination is complete, except when voluntarily retained for future family medical
history.
7. The department of health and senior services and the department of social
services shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,

HB 3197 3
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔